District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.03

Effect of registration for enforcement.

(a)

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of the District.

(b)

A registered order issued in another state is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of the District.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, a tribunal of the District shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 603, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.3.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 603 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).